Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-15,271
Recreation camps; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-15,271 to 81-15,277, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Recreation camp means one or more temporary or permanent tents, buildings, structures, or site pads, together with the tract of land appertaining thereto, established or maintained for more than a consecutive forty-eight-hour period as living quarters or sites used for purposes of sleeping or the preparation and the serving of food extending beyond the limits of a family group for children or adults, or both, for recreation, education, or vacation purposes, and including facilities located on either privately or publicly owned lands except hotels or inns; and

(2) Person means any individual or group of individuals, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.

Laws 1959, c. 328, § 1, p. 1193;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 432;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 641;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 106;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 556;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-3101;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 11.
July 1, 2021